Arkansas, session 2025, HB1562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-16-105 is amended to read as follows:
18-16-105. Termination of oral lease of farmlands.
The owner of farmlands that are rented or leased under an oral rental
or lease agreement may elect not to renew the oral rental or lease agreement
for the following calendar year by giving written notice by certified mail
any method of service permitted under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure to the renter or lessee on or before June 30 that the oral rental
or lease agreement will not be renewed for the following calendar year.








*CEB189*
02/24/2025 12:34:50 PM CEB189